Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2648.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of economic security; child care assistance; exemption A. The sum of $160,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for child care assistance. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.